Washington statutes.
RCW 26.14.220

Enforcement of confirmed award.

(1) The court shall enforce an award confirmed under RCW 26.14.150, including a temporary award, in the manner and to the same extent as any other order or judgment of a court.

(2) The court shall enforce an arbitration award in a family law dispute confirmed by a court in another state in the manner and to the same extent as any other order or judgment from another state.

[ 2023 c 61 s 23.]